Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 21 Judgments, Orders, and Decrees

9-21-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 427; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 35, effective January 10, 1966. The provisions for entry of judgment in superior court are contained in Civil Procedure Rules 58, 77(d). For forms of judgment, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P., Forms 31, 32. For entry of judgment in district court, see Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 58.

9-21-2.
Relief from judgment or decree.

On motion and upon such terms as are just, a court may relieve a party or his or her legal representative from a final judgment, order, decree, or proceeding entered therein for the following reasons:

Mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect;

Newly discovered evidence which by due diligence could not have been discovered in time to move for a new trial under applicable law;

Fraud (whether heretofore denominated intrinsic or extrinsic), misrepresentation, or other misconduct of an adverse party;

The judgment is void;

The judgment has been satisfied, released, or discharged, or a prior judgment upon which it is based has been reversed or otherwise vacated, or it is no longer equitable that the judgment should have prospective application; or

Any other reason justifying relief from the operation of the judgment.

The motion shall be made within a reasonable time and not more than one year after the judgment, order, or proceeding was entered or taken.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 428; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 36.

9-21-3.
Interlocutory decrees and orders entered by clerk.

The supreme or superior court may by rule authorize the clerk to enter up interlocutory decrees and orders when appropriate, subject to be set aside or varied upon application and notice.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 438; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-3

.

9-21-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C. P. A. 1905, § 471; G.L. 1909, ch. 297, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 347, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 36); Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 7.

9-21-5.
Supreme court order for new trial where trial was not full, fair, and impartial.

A party or garnishee in any action or proceeding in the superior court in which a trial has been had which was not full, fair, and impartial may, at any time within one year after judgment, petition the supreme court for a new trial; and the supreme court may, with or without terms, order a new trial in the superior court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 472; G.L. 1909, ch. 297, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 347, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-5

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 36.

Parties.

Cestui que trust who was not party to proceeding to declare trust void may not under this section obtain relief against decree. Primitive Methodist Church v. Homer,

38 R.I. 530

, 96 A. 818,

1916 R.I. LEXIS 12

(1916).

9-21-6.
Allowance of appellate proceedings after time expired.

When any person is aggrieved by an order, decree, decision, or judgment of the district court or of any probate court or town council from which an appeal or other review is available in the superior court and, because of accident, mistake, unforeseen cause, or excusable neglect has failed to claim his or her appeal, the superior court, if it appears that justice so requires, may, upon petition filed within ninety (90) days after the entry of the order, decree, decision, or judgment, allow an appeal to be taken and prosecuted upon such terms and conditions as the court may prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 204, § 1.

9-21-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 341; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 535, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 35, effective January 10, 1966.

9-21-8.
Interest on judgment for money.

Every judgment for money shall draw interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum to the time of its discharge.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 436; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 484, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-8

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 36; P.L. 1981, ch. 54, § 1.

9-21-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 437; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 484, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-21-9

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 35, effective January 10, 1966.

9-21-10.
Interest in civil actions.

In any civil action in which a verdict is rendered or a decision made for pecuniary damages, there shall be added by the clerk of the court to the amount of damages interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum thereon from the date the cause of action accrued, which shall be included in the judgment entered therein. Post-judgment interest shall be calculated at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum and accrue on both the principal amount of the judgment and the prejudgment interest entered therein. This section shall not apply until entry of judgment or to any contractual obligation where interest is already provided.

Subsection (a) shall not apply in any action filed on or after January 1, 1987, for personal injury or wrongful death filed against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services, dentist, or dental hygienist based on professional negligence. In all such medical malpractice actions in which a verdict is rendered or a decision made for pecuniary damages, there shall be added by the clerk of the court to the amount of damages interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum thereon from the date of written notice of the claim by the claimant or his or her representative to the malpractice liability insurer, or to the medical or dental health care provider or the filing of the civil action, whichever first occurs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 36; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 10; P.L. 1970, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 350, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 555, § 2.

Partial Settlement.

When parties settle without reference to any release given to an earlier settling tortfeasor, prejudgment interest is computed as follows: the later settling defendant is charged with interest on the entire amount of damages from the date on which the plaintiff’s cause of action arose to the date of payment by an earlier settling tortfeasor; the plaintiff’s total damages then are reduced by the amount of the earlier payment and the later settling defendant is charged with interest on the reduced balance of the remaining damages for the period from the date of the earlier payment to the date of entry of judgment; then, the interest charged for both periods is added together and the sum added to the remaining tortfeasor’s post-reduction damages liability. Merrill v. Trenn, 706 A.2d 1305,

1998 R.I. LEXIS 50

(R.I. 1998).

9-21-10.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 21, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1989, ch. 555, §§ 1, 6, effective July 12, 1989.

9-21-11.
Restraining orders — Notification of local authorities.

The clerk of the superior court of each county may, if requested by the prevailing party’s attorney, immediately forward a certified copy of any restraining order issued by a justice of the superior court to the police department of the municipality in which the prevailing party is domiciled whenever the order enjoins one party from interfering with the person of another.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 401, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 308, § 1.

9-21-12.
Mandatory conference to consider periodic payments of judgment.

In any action to recover damages for personal injury, injury to property, or wrongful death for which a judgment of one hundred fifty thousand ($150,000) dollars or more is entered, a post-judgment conference shall be held after the court has decided any motion for new trial, whether the motion is for retrial on liability and damages or for additur or remittitur, at which the trial judge, plaintiff(s)’s counsel, and defendant(s)’s counsel shall be present. The conference will be for the purpose of determining the viability of a voluntary agreement for payment of the judgment in periodic installments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 350, § 9; P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 6.

9-21-13.
Periodic payment of tort judgments.

In any legal action based upon a cause of action arising for personal injury, property damage, or wrongful death in which damages, if liability is proved, are likely to be in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the parties shall consider the use of periodic payments as means of settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 1.